Maryland, session 2026, SB0891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for the
delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in accordance
with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR SCREENING FOR PERINATAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS AT
WELL VISITS WITHIN THE FIRST YEAR OF THE CHILD’S LIFE, AS DETERMINED
APPROPRIATE BY THE TREATING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER.
Article – Insurance
15–830.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer that offers health insurance other than long–term
care insurance or disability insurance;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization; or
(v) except for a managed care organization as defined in Title 15,
Subtitle 1 of the Health – General Article, any other person that provides health benefit
plans subject to State regulation.
(3) (i) “Member” means an individual entitled to health care benefits
under a policy or plan issued or delivered in the State by a carrier.
(ii) “Member” includes a subscriber.
(4) “MENTAL HEALTH DISORDER” INCLUDES A PERINATAL MENTAL
HEALTH CONDITION.
– 3 –

Ch. 636 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(4)] (5) “Nonphysician specialist” means a health care provider:
(i) 1. who is not a physician;
2. who is licensed or certified under the Health Occupations
Article; and
3. who is certified or trained to treat or provide health care
services for a specified condition or disease in a manner that is within the scope of the
license or certification of the health care provider; or
(ii) that is licensed as a behavioral health program under § 7.5–401
of the Health – General Article.
(6) (5) (I) “PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITION” MEANS A MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITION OCCURRING
DURING PREGNANCY, THE POSTPARTUM PERIOD, OR THE PERINATAL PERIOD OR
WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE CONCLUSION OF A PREGNANCY, INCLUDING A
PREGNANCY THAT DOES NOT RESULT IN A LIVE BIRTH.
(II) “PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITION”
INCLUDES POSTPARTUM DEPRESSION.
[(5)] (7) (6) (i) “Provider panel” means the providers that contract with a
carrier either directly or through a subcontracting entity to provide health care services to
enrollees of the carrier.
(ii) “Provider panel” does not include an arrangement in which any
provider may participate solely by contracting with the carrier to provide health care
services at a discounted fee–for–service rate.
[(6)] (8) (7) “Specialist” means a physician who is certified or trained to
practice in a specified field of medicine and who is not designated as a primary care provider
by the carrier.
(c) (1) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a member
who is pregnant shall receive a standing referral to an obstetrician, in accordance with this
subsection.
[(2)] (II) After the member who is pregnant receives a standing referral to
an obstetrician, the obstetrician is responsible for the primary management of the
member’s pregnancy, including the issuance of referrals in accordance with the carrier’s
policies and procedures, through the postpartum period.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, A
MEMBER SHALL RECEIVE A STANDING REFERRAL TO A MENTAL HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, FOR THE DURATION OF THE
MEMBER’S PREGNANCY AND 1 YEAR AFTER THE MEMBER GIVES BIRTH TO A
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
PROVIDER’S LICENSE, INCLUDING A PSYCHIATRIST, PSYCHOLOGIST, LICENSED
SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL, OR LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR FOR:
(I) THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES RECOGNIZED BY THE
UNITED STATES PREVENTIVE SERVICES TASK FORCE AS PREVENTIVE BENEFITS;
AND
(II) THE DURATION OF THE MEMBER’S PREGNANCY AND 1 YEAR
AFTER THE CONCLUSION OF THE PREGNANCY.
(3) A written treatment plan may not be required when a standing referral
is to an obstetrician OR MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER under this
subsection.
(d) (1) Each carrier shall establish and implement a procedure by which a
member may request a referral to a specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not part of
the carrier’s provider panel in accordance with this subsection.
(2) The procedure shall provide for a referral to a specialist or nonphysician
specialist who is not part of the carrier’s provider panel if:
(i) 1. the member is diagnosed with a condition or disease that
requires specialized health care services or medical care; and
2. A. the carrier does not have in its provider panel a
specialist or nonphysician specialist with the professional training and expertise to treat or
provide health care services for the condition or disease; or
B. the carrier cannot provide reasonable access to a specialist
or nonphysician specialist with the professional training and expertise to treat or provide
health care services for the condition or disease without unreasonable delay or travel,
including within the reasonable appointment waiting time and travel distance standards
established in regulation for mental health and substance use disorder services; or
(ii) 1. the member is seeking mental health or substance use
disorder care; and
2. the carrier cannot provide reasonable access to a specialist
or nonphysician specialist within the reasonable appointment waiting time and travel
– 5 –

Ch. 636 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
distance standards established in regulation for mental health and substance use disorder
services.
(3) The procedure shall ensure that a request to obtain a referral to a
specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not part of the carrier’s provider panel is
addressed in a timely manner that is:
(i) appropriate for the member’s condition; and
(ii) in accordance with the timeliness requirements for
determinations made by private review agents under § 15–10B–06 of this title.
(4) If a member cannot access mental health or substance use disorder
services through the referral requirements under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection,
the procedure shall require the carrier to provide additional assistance to the member in
identifying and arranging coverage of mental health or substance use disorder services by
a specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not part of the carrier’s provider panel.
(5) If a carrier approves a member’s request for a referral made in
accordance with this subsection, the carrier may not require utilization review other than
what would be required if the covered benefit were provided by a provider on the carrier’s
provider panel.
(6) The procedure may not be used by a carrier as a substitute for
establishing and maintaining a sufficient provider network in accordance with § 15–112 of
this title.
(7) Each carrier shall:
(i) have a system in place that documents all requests to obtain a
referral to receive a covered service from a specialist or nonphysician specialist who is not
part of the carrier’s provider panel;
(ii) inform members of the procedure to request a referral under
paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
(iii) provide the information documented under item (i) of this
paragraph to the Commissioner on request.
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–830 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR SCREENING FOR PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITIONS:
(I) AT EACH PRENATAL VISIT;
(II) AT LEAST ONCE WITHIN 6 WEEKS AFTER THE INSURED OR
ENROLLEE GAVE BIRTH; AND
(III) AT EACH WELL CHILD VISIT VISITS WITHIN THE FIRST YEAR OF THE
CHILD’S LIFE, AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE TREATING HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AN
ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT THE COVERAGE REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION TO A COPAYMENT OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR
DEDUCTIBLE THAT AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION IMPOSES FOR SIMILAR
COVERAGES UNDER THE SAME POLICY OR CONTRACT.
(II) THE COPAYMENT OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR
DEDUCTIBLE IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT BE
GREATER THAN THE COPAYMENT OR COINSURANCE REQUIREMENT OR DEDUCTIBLE
IMPOSED BY THE ENTITY FOR SIMILAR COVERAGES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health – General
20–1801.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 7 –

Ch. 636 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) “HEALTH CARE PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON WHO IS LICENSED,
CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS
ARTICLE TO PROVIDE HEALTH OR MEDICAL CARE IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF
BUSINESS OR PRACTICE OF A PROFESSION.
(C) (1) “PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITION” MEANS
A MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITION OCCURRING DURING PREGNANCY, THE
POSTPARTUM PERIOD, OR THE PERINATAL PERIOD OR WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE
CONCLUSION OF A PREGNANCY, INCLUDING A PREGNANCY THAT DOES NOT RESULT
IN A LIVE BIRTH.
(2) “PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITION”
INCLUDES POSTPARTUM DEPRESSION.
[20–1801.] 20–1802.
(a) [(1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Health care facility” means a facility or an office where health
or medical care is provided to patients by a health care provider.
(ii) “Health care facility” includes a hospital and a limited service
hospital.
(3) “Health care provider” means a person who is licensed, certified, or
otherwise authorized under the Health Occupations Article to provide health or medical
care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.
(4) “Hospital” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of this article.
(5) “Limited service hospital” has the meaning stated in § 19–301 of this
article.
(b)] The Department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall identify up–to–date,
evidence–based, written information about perinatal [mood and anxiety disorders]
MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS that:
(1) Has been reviewed by medical experts and national and local
organizations specializing in maternal mental health;
(2) Is designed for use by health care providers and pregnant and
postpartum women and their families;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(3) Is culturally and linguistically appropriate for potential recipients of
the information; and
(4) Includes:
(i) Information addressing:
1. The signs and symptoms of perinatal mood and anxiety
disorders;
2. Perinatal medication usage;
3. Risk factors of perinatal [mood and anxiety disorders]
MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS, including perinatal loss and high–risk
pregnancy;
4. How and when to screen for symptoms of perinatal [mood
and anxiety disorders] MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS;
5. Brief intervention strategies; and
6. Evidence–based psychosocial treatments; and
(ii) Contact information for national and local maternal mental
health programs and services.
[(c)] (B) The Department shall:
(1) Provide the information identified by the Department under subsection
[(b)] (A) of this section to [health]:
(I) HEALTH care facilities and health care providers that provide
prenatal care, labor and delivery services, and postnatal care to expectant parents; AND
(II) EACH LOCAL SPECIAL SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION
PROGRAM FOR WOMEN, INFANTS, AND CHILDREN AGENCY IN THE STATE; and
(2) Make the information identified by the Department under subsection
[(b)] (A) of this section available on the Department’s website.
(C) A AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH TRIMESTER, A HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER WHO EVALUATES AND MANAGES PREGNANCY OR POSTPARTUM
PERINATAL CARE WHILE ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER’S LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE SHALL PROVIDE THE TO A PATIENT:
– 9 –

Ch. 636 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) THE INFORMATION IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO A PATIENT AT EACH PRENATAL VISIT; OR
(2) OTHER APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ON PERINATAL
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS.
(D) A HOSPITAL SHALL PROVIDE THE INFORMATION IDENTIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO A BIRTHING PARENT ON
DISCHARGE FROM THE BIRTHING HOSPITAL.
[20–1802.] 20–1803.
(a) The Department, in [collaboration with MedChi, The Maryland State Medical
Society, the Maryland Nurses Association, the Maryland Affiliate of the American College
of Nurse Midwives, the Maryland Psychological Association, and any other health
professional association or public health entity in the State identified by the Department]
CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS, THE STATE BOARD OF
NURSING, AND POSTPARTUM SUPPORT INTERNATIONAL, shall identify and develop
training programs that improve early identification of [postpartum depression and]
perinatal [mood and anxiety disorders] MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL MAY USE TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 1–231 OF THE
HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
(b) The programs IDENTIFIED OR developed under subsection (a) of this section
shall include continuing medical education programs developed by organizations that are
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Continuing Medical Education.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A LIST OF TRAINING PROGRAMS
IDENTIFIED OR DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ON REQUEST.
20–1804.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICIANS AND THE STATE BOARD OF NURSING, SHALL DEVELOP A PERINATAL
MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION SCREENING PROGRAM.
(B) THE PROGRAM DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL REQUIRE A A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER WHO EVALUATES AND MANAGES
PREGNANCY OR POSTPARTUM CARE WHILE ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER’S LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE TO SHALL CONDUCT A
SCREENING FOR PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS:
(1) AT EACH PRENATAL VISIT;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(2) AT LEAST ONCE WITHIN 6 WEEKS AFTER THE INSURED OR
ENROLLEE GAVE BIRTH; AND
(3) AT EACH AT WELL CHILD VISIT VISITS WITHIN THE FIRST YEAR OF
THE CHILD’S LIFE, AS DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE TREATING HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER.
(C) (B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY ACCEPTABLE
SCREENING TOOLS FOR CONDUCTING THE SCREENINGS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE SCREENING TOOLS IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE VALIDATED, ROUTINELY USED, FREE, EASY TO
ADMINISTER AND SCORE, AND AVAILABLE IN MULTIPLE LANGUAGES.
(D) (C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSIST HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WITH
ACCESSING RESOURCES AND REFERRAL SERVICES THROUGH MARYLAND
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INTEGRATION IN PEDIATRIC PRIMARY CARE, MATERNAL
HEALTH INNOVATION PROGRAM, AND POSTPARTUM SUPPORT INTERNATIONAL TO
ASSIST PROVIDERS IN FINDING TIMELY AND EFFECTIVE CARE FOR INDIVIDUALS
IDENTIFIED AS AT RISK FOR A PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CONDITION.
Article – Health Occupations
1–231.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN APPLICANT A LICENSEE OR
CERTIFICATE HOLDER WHO EVALUATES AND MANAGES PREGNANCY OR
POSTPARTUM PERINATAL CARE WHILE ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE
APPLICANT’S LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN
APPLICANT FOR THE RENEWAL OF A LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY A HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS BOARD UNDER THIS ARTICLE WHO INTERACTS WITH THE PERINATAL
POPULATION SHALL PROVIDE SATISFACTORY DOCUMENTATION WITH THE
RENEWAL APPLICATION THAT THE APPLICANT HAS COMPLETED AT LEAST TWO
CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDIT HOURS EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD THAT
REQUIRES A LICENSEE OR CERTIFICATE HOLDER TO COMPLETE CONTINUING
EDUCATION AS A CONDITION OF THE RENEWAL OF THE LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE
SHALL GRANT AT LEAST 2 HOURS OF CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS FOR EVERY
1 HOUR OF CONTINUING EDUCATION COMPLETED BY THE LICENSEE OR
– 11 –

Ch. 636 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
CERTIFICATE HOLDER ON PERINATAL MENTAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CONDITIONS
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 20–1803 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE.
(2) THE CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENT UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL APPLY ONLY TO AN APPLICANT’S FIRST
LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE RENEWAL AFTER APRIL 1, 2027.
(C) EACH HEALTH OCCUPATIONS BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
CARRY OUT THIS SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS SPECIFYING WHICH
PROVIDERS ARE SUBJECT TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION ESTABLISHING
THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF CONTINUING EDUCATION CREDITS THAT MAY BE
GRANTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Maryland Health Care Commission shall:
(1) conduct an analysis in accordance with § 15–1501 of the Insurance
Article on impact of:
(i) requiring the Maryland Medical Assistance Program, the State
Health Plan, and insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State and health
maintenance organizations that provide hospital, medical, or surgical benefits to
individuals or groups under contract that are issued or delivered in the State to provide
coverage for screening for perinatal behavioral health conditions:
1. at each prenatal visit;
2. at least once within 6 weeks after the insured or enrollee
gave birth; and
3. at each well child visit within the first year of the child’s
life; and
(ii) prohibiting the entities described in item (i) of this item from
subjecting the coverage required under item (i) of this item from:
1. imposing a copayment or coinsurance requirement or
deductible that is greater than the copayment or coinsurance requirement or deductible
imposed by the entity for similar coverages; or
2. imposing any copayment or coinsurance requirement or
deductible; and
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 636
(2) report to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on its findings
from the analysis conducted in accordance with paragraph (1) of this section.
SECTION 3. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
apply to all policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the
State on or after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 Sections 1 and 2
of this Act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 4 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026 July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 13 –